Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-204.03
Prenatal care, defined.

Prenatal care means an office visit to an advanced practice registered nurse for pregnancy-related care occurring before birth.

Laws 2022, LB905, § 5.